Hawaii statutes.
§604-3 Disqualification, absence, vacancy.
Whenever it is advisable, by reason of a vacancy in the office of district
judge of any circuit, or by reason of the disqualification of any district
judge, or the district judge's inability to attend to the district judge's
duties by reason of illness or temporary absence, or for any other reason, the
chief justice of the supreme court may designate the district judge of any
other circuit, or any district family judge of any circuit, to hear and
determine any and all matters then or thereafter pending in the district court
to which the district judge or district family judge is called for such
purpose, and while so engaged, the district judge or district family judge
shall have and exercise all of the powers of a regularly appointed judge of the
circuit to which the district judge or district family judge is called. [L
1931, c 101, §2; RL 1935, §3762; am L 1941, c 26, §1; RL 1945, §9673; am L
1949, c 228, §1; RL 1955, §216-3; am L 1957, c 181, §1; am L 1959, c 262, §5;
am imp L 1965, c 97, §1; HRS §604-3; am L 1970, c 188, §10; am L 1975, c 124,
§1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Disability, absence, see DCRCP rule 63.

Case Notes

Substitute magistrates paid only for days actual services are
performed. 41 H. 156 (1955).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next